uz.aff
SFX Z 0 tkizmaganlaringniku . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmaganlaringga . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmaganlaringgami . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmaganlaringgadir . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmaganlaringgada . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmaganlaringgadirda . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmaganlaringgamikan . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmaganlaringgaku . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmaganlaringdan . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmaganlaringdanmi . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmaganlaringdandir . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmaganlaringdanda . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmaganlaringdandirda . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmaganlaringdanmikan . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmaganlaringdanku . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmaganlaringda . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmaganlaringdami . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmaganlaringdadir . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmaganlaringdada . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmaganlaringdadirda . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmaganlaringdamikan . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmaganlaringdaku . 
