uz.dic
abjaqla/Z
shirqilla/Z
shoxla/Z
sho’ng’i/Z
ezala/Z
eksonla/Z
elangla/Z
elqi/Z
elpoqla/Z
emdala/Z
emla/Z
ermakla/Z
esna/Z
eshelonla/Z
yaqinla/Z
yaraqla/Z
yarimla/Z
yaxla/Z
yashikla/Z
